Utah statutes.
53A-16-101.   Uniform School Fund -- Contents -- Interest and Dividends
Account.
(1)  The Uniform School Fund established by Utah Constitution, Article X,
Section 5, consists of:
(a)  interest and dividends derived from the investment of monies in the
permanent State School Fund established by Utah Constitution, Article X,
Section 5;
(b)  money transferred to the fund pursuant to Title 67, Chapter 4a, Unclaimed
Property Act; and
(c)  all other constitutional or legislative allocations to the fund,
including revenues received by donation.
(2) (a)  There is created within the Uniform School Fund a restricted account
known as the Interest and Dividends Account.
(b)  The Interest and Dividends Account consists of:
(i)  interest and dividends derived from the investment of monies in the
permanent State School Fund referred to in Subsection (1)(a); and
(ii)  interest on account monies.
(3) (a)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, monies from the Interest and
Dividends Account shall be used for the School LAND Trust Program as provided
in Section 53A-16-101.5.
(b)  The Legislature may appropriate any remaining balance for the support of
the public education system.
